Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5512HV (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2519 Section 1. Section 252C.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 252C.6 Interest on support debts. 3 1. Interest accrues shall accrue on support debts at the 4 rate provided in section 535.3 for court judgments. 5 2. The department may shall collect the accrued interest 6 but is not required to maintain interest balance accounts on 7 support debts, and a court order shall not be required for the 8 department to collect the accrued interest . 9 3. Child support services may waive payment of the interest 10 accrued on a support debt if the waiver will facilitate the 11 collection of the support debt. 12